California, session 20252026, SB797.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 21080.6 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.6.(a)This division does not apply to a project for the conversion of overhead electric utility distribution system facilities or transmission system facilities to underground or the insulation of electric utility distribution system facilities or transmission system facilities, except that this division shall apply to the project if the project is located in an environmentally sensitive area, as defined in Section 30107.5.(b)This section shall become inoperative upon submission of the plan pursuant to Section 279 of the Public Utilities Code, but no later than July 1, 2027, and as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.SEC. 2.SECTION 1. Section 279 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:279. (a) The commission shall form a working group to study the cost of undergrounding and insulating electric utility distribution system facilities or transmission system facilities, compile wildfire mitigation reports of electrical utilities, and provide the Legislature, on or before July 1, 2027, with a plan on how to most effectively invest in undergrounding and insulating those facilities or how to provide support to electrical corporations in order to prevent fires in lands classified as very high fire hazard severity zones, as defined in Section 51177 of the Government Code, in lands designated as Wildland Urban Interface Fire Areas, as described in Section 13108.5.1 of the Health and Safety Code, and in state forests, as defined in Section 4643 of the Public Resources Code.(b) (1) The plan to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.SEC. 3.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.